tests/morphophonology/pending/optative.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../../../tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../../../tat.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] please move it from the pending folder above to other tests once you make it work": 
     кара<vaux><opt><p1><sg> : карыйм
     кара<vaux><opt><p1><pl> : карыйк
     кара<vaux><opt><p3><sg> : карасын
     кара<vaux><opt><p3><pl> : карасыннар

     бәйлә<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : бәйлим
     бәйлә<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : бәйлик
     бәйлә<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : бәйләсен
     бәйлә<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : бәйләсеннәр

     укы<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : укыйм
     укы<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : укыйк
     укы<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : укысын
     укы<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : укысыннар

     селке<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : селким
     селке<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : селкик
     селке<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : селкесен
     селке<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : селкесеннәр

     сук<v><iv><opt><p1><sg> : сугыйм
     сук<v><iv><opt><p1><pl> : сугыйк
     сук<v><iv><opt><p3><sg> : суксын
     сук<v><iv><opt><p3><pl> : суксыннар

     сүк<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : сүгим
     сүк<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : сүгик
     сүк<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : сүксен
     сүк<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : сүксеннәр

     буя<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : буйыйм
     буя<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : буйыйк
     буя<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : буясын
     буя<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : буясыннар

     сөй<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : сөйим
     сөй<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : сөйик
     сөй<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : сөйсен
     сөй<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : сөйсеннәр

     си<v><iv><opt><p1><sg> : сиим
     си<v><iv><opt><p3><sg> : сисен
